hunspell/mhr/mari.aff
FLAG long
SFX V8 нчаш чмеш/S2 нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешем/S2 нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешет/S2 нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешыже нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешыжак нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешыжат нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешыжыс нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешна/S4 нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешда/S4 нчаш
SFX V8 нчаш чмешышт/S2 нчаш
SFX V8 таш меш/S2 екташ
SFX V8 таш мешем/S2 екташ
SFX V8 таш мешет/S2 екташ
SFX V8 таш мешыже екташ
SFX V8 таш мешыжак екташ
SFX V8 таш мешыжат екташ
SFX V8 таш мешыжыс екташ
SFX V8 таш мешна/S4 екташ
SFX V8 таш мешда/S4 екташ
SFX V8 таш мешышт/S2 екташ
SFX V8 аш шыла/S4 [^чн][^кч]аш
SFX V8 каш шыла/S4 [чш]каш
SFX V8 нчаш чшыла/S4 нчаш
SFX V8 таш шыла/S4 екташ
SFX V8 аш шыжла/S4 [^чн][^кч]аш
SFX V8 каш шыжла/S4 [чш]каш
SFX V8 нчаш чшыжла/S4 нчаш
SFX V8 таш шыжла/S4 екташ
SFX V8 аш ман/S2 [^чн][^кч]аш
SFX V8 каш ман/S2 [чш]каш
SFX V8 нчаш чман/S2 нчаш
SFX V8 таш ман/S2 екташ
